Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.042

Consultation with commodity commissions.

The director may consult with each commodity commission established under state law in order to establish or maintain an integrated comprehensive regulatory scheme for each commodity and the agricultural industry in this state as a whole.

[ 2002 c 313 s 112.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.